Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 43
SCHOLARSHIPS

Section.

33-4301. Short title.

This act may be cited as “The Scholarships and State Aid Act.”

33-4302. Armed forces and public safety officer scholarships.

The following individuals shall be eligible for the scholarship program provided for herein:

Any spouse or child of any Idaho citizen who, while such person is or was a resident of the state of Idaho, has been determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing in action; or to have died of, or become totally and permanently disabled by, injuries or wounds sustained in action in any area of armed conflict in which the United States is a party; and

Any spouse or child of any member of the armed forces of the United States who is stationed in the state of Idaho on military orders and who is deployed from the state of Idaho to any area of armed conflict in which the United States is a party and who has been determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing in action; or to have died of, or become totally and permanently disabled by, injuries or wounds sustained in action as a result of such deployment.

Any spouse or child of a full-time or part-time public safety officer, as defined in paragraph (d) of this subsection, employed by or volunteering for the state of Idaho or for a political subdivision of the state of Idaho, which public safety officer is or was a resident of the state of Idaho at the time such officer was killed or totally and permanently disabled in the line of duty. The death or disability shall have occurred on or after January 1, 1975. The scholarship provided for in this section shall not be available unless it is determined that:

The death or disablement of the public safety officer occurred in the performance of the officer’s duties;

The death or disablement was not caused by the intentional misconduct of the public safety officer or by such officer’s intentional infliction of injury; and

The public safety officer was not voluntarily intoxicated at the time of death.

For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Public safety officer” means a peace officer or firefighter, a paramedic or emergency medical technician as those terms are defined in section 56-1012, Idaho Code.

“Volunteering” means contributing services as a bona fide member of a legally organized law enforcement agency, fire department or licensed emergency medical service provider organization.

To be eligible for the scholarship provided for herein, a child of a military member or a public safety officer must be a resident of the state of Idaho and must have completed secondary school or its equivalent in the state of Idaho. A child already born, or born after a military member or public safety officer is determined to be imprisoned or missing in action, or is killed or becomes totally and permanently disabled, shall be eligible for this scholarship;
(2)(a) To be eligible for the scholarship provided for herein, a child of a military member or a public safety officer must be a resident of the state of Idaho and must have completed secondary school or its equivalent in the state of Idaho. A child already born, or born after a military member or public safety officer is determined to be imprisoned or missing in action, or is killed or becomes totally and permanently disabled, shall be eligible for this scholarship;

To be eligible for the scholarship provided for herein, the spouse of a military member or public safety officer must be a resident of the state of Idaho and must have been married to such person at the time the military member or public safety officer was determined to be imprisoned or missing in action, or was killed or became totally and permanently disabled. Provided however, that in the situation of disability, the spouse must be currently married to such person.

An eligible individual who applies for the scholarship provided for herein shall, after verification of eligibility, receive the scholarship and be admitted to attend undergraduate studies at any public institution of higher education or public professional-technical college within the state of Idaho without the necessity of paying tuition and fees therefor; such student shall be provided with books, equipment and supplies necessary for pursuit of such program of enrollment not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per quarter, semester, intensified semester, or like educational period; such student shall be furnished on-campus institution housing and subsistence for each month he or she is enrolled full-time under this program and actually resides in such on-campus facility; provided however, that such undergraduate educational benefits shall not exceed a total of thirty-six (36) months or four (4) nine (9) month periods. Provided further, that the initiation of such educational benefits shall extend for a period of ten (10) years after achieving a high school diploma or its equivalency, or for a period of ten (10) years after the event giving rise to the eligibility for the scholarship, whichever is longer.

The eligible individual shall meet such other educational qualifications as such institution of higher education or professional-technical college has established for other prospective students of this state, as well as any additional educational qualifications established by the state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho.

Application for eligibility under this section shall be made to the state board of education and the board of regents of the university of Idaho or the state board of vocational-technical education. The board shall verify the eligibility of the applicant and communicate such eligibility to such person and the affected institution or college.

Affected institutions shall in their preparation of future budgets include therein costs resultant from such tuition, fee, book, equipment, supply, housing and subsistence loss for reimbursement thereof from appropriations of state funds.

For the purposes of this section, a member of the armed forces of the United States is considered totally and permanently disabled if at the time of application a current disability determination made by the United States social security administration is in effect with respect to such individual.

For the purposes of this section, a public safety officer is considered totally and permanently disabled if at the time of application a current disability determination made by the public employee retirement system of Idaho is in effect with respect to such individual.

The state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho may adopt rules to implement and administer the scholarship program provided for in this section.

33-4302A. Public safety officer scholarships

State aid. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 4, effective July 1, 2013.

33-4303. Idaho opportunity scholarship.

The purposes of this section are to:

Recognize that all Idaho citizens benefit from an educated citizenry;

Increase individual economic vitality and improve the overall quality of life for many of Idaho’s citizens;

Provide access to eligible Idaho postsecondary education through funding to remove financial barriers;

Increase the opportunity for economically disadvantaged Idaho students; and

Incentivize students to complete a postsecondary education degree or certificate.

For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Educational costs” means the dollar amount determined annually by the state board of education as necessary for student tuition, fees, books and such other expenses reasonably related to attendance at an eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution.

“Eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution” means a public postsecondary organization governed or supervised by the state board, the board of regents of the university of Idaho, a board of trustees of a community college established pursuant to the provisions of chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, or the state board for career technical education or any educational organization located in Idaho that is:

Operated privately;

Classified as not-for-profit under state law;

Under the control of an independent board and not directly controlled or administered by a public or political subdivision; and

Accredited by an organization recognized by the state board as provided in section 33-2402, Idaho Code.

Has graduated or will graduate from an accredited high school or its equivalent in Idaho as determined by the state board;

Has enrolled or applied to an eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution;

Is a postsecondary undergraduate student who has not previously completed a baccalaureate (bachelor’s) degree or higher; and

Meets need and merit criteria as set by the state board.

“Eligible student” means a student who:

Is an Idaho resident as defined in section 33-3717B, Idaho Code;

“Shared model of responsibility” means a model set by the board to determine the required and expected contributions of the student, the student’s family and available federal financial aid.

“State board” means the state board of education.

The state board shall promulgate rules to determine student eligibility, academic and financial eligibility, a process for eligible students to apply, amount of awards, how eligible students will be selected and when the awards shall be made, as well as other rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(4) An eligible student must:

Apply or have applied for federal student financial assistance available to an eligible student who will attend or is enrolled in an eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution; and

Meet need and merit criteria established by the state board in rule.

All moneys placed in the account and earnings thereon are hereby perpetually appropriated to the state board for the purpose described in paragraph (b) of this subsection. All expenditures from the account shall be paid out in warrants drawn by the state controller upon presentation of the proper vouchers. Up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of the annual earnings distribution to the state board may be used by the state board annually for administrative costs related to the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

Allowable administrative costs include, but are not limited to, operating expenses for the implementation and maintenance of a database, operating expenses to administer the program, personnel costs necessary to administer the program and costs related to promoting awareness of the program.

Any unused annual funds shall be deposited into the opportunity scholarship program account.

Pending use, surplus moneys in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer or endowment fund investment board in the same manner as provided under section 67-1210 or 68-501, Idaho Code, as applicable. Interest earned on the investments shall be returned to the account.

“Eligible student” also means a student who has met the eligibility requirements and was awarded an opportunity scholarship prior to June 30, 2014. Continued eligibility shall be based upon the eligibility requirements at the time of the original award.

(d) “Opportunity scholarship program” means the scholarship program described in this section and in the rules established by the state board.

(5) Funds that are available for the opportunity scholarship program shall be used to provide scholarships based upon a shared model of responsibility between the scholarship recipient and the recipient’s family, the federal government and the participating eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution that the recipient attends for covering the educational costs.

(6) Up to twenty percent (20%) of funds that are available for the opportunity scholarship program may be used for awards to adult students who have earned at least twenty-four (24) credits toward a postsecondary degree or certificate and who return to an eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution to complete a certificate or degree.

(7) The opportunity scholarship award shall not exceed the actual educational costs at the eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution that the student attends. The amount of scholarship shall not exceed the educational costs established by the state board.

(8) Award payments shall be made annually to an eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution. In no instance may the entire amount of an award be paid to or on behalf of such student in advance.

(9) If an eligible student becomes ineligible for a scholarship under the provisions of this chapter, or if a student discontinues attendance before the end of any semester, quarter, term or equivalent covered by the award after receiving payment under this chapter, the eligible Idaho postsecondary educational institution shall remit, up to the amount of any payments made under this program, any prorated tuition or fee balances to the state board.

(10) There is hereby created an account in the state treasury to be designated the opportunity scholarship program account.

(a) The account shall consist of moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature, moneys contributed to the account from other sources and the earnings on such moneys. The executive director of the state board may receive on behalf of the state board any moneys or real or personal property donated, bequeathed, devised or conditionally granted to the state board for purposes of providing funding for such account. Moneys received directly or derived from the sale of such property shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the account.

(b) Earnings from moneys in the account or specified gifts shall be distributed annually to the state board to implement the opportunity scholarship program as provided for under the provisions of this chapter.

(11) The effectiveness of the Idaho opportunity scholarship will be evaluated by the state board on a regular basis. This evaluation will include annual data collection as well as longer-term evaluations.

33-4304. Scholarship program reporting requirements.

All eligible institutions participating in the scholarships and state aid programs shall report student level data on the effectiveness of the program. The data reported shall be established by the state board of education.

33-4305. Purposes. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4306. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4307. Eligibility — Maximum amounts

Conditions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4308. Maximum number of grants. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4309. Remittance in case of discontinued attendance. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4310. Discrimination prohibited. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4311. Certifications of enrollment and termination of attendance of grant recipients. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4312. State board of education and board of regents of University of Idaho as administrative agency. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4313. Duties of board. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4314. Appointment of administrator and staff. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.

33-4315. No control of nonpublic institutions which accept grant recipients. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 1, 2014.